Utah statutes.
31A-22-715.   Optional rider for alcohol and drug dependency treatment.

Each group accident and health insurance policy shall contain an optional rider allowing certificate holders to obtain coverage for alcohol or drug dependency treatment in programs licensed by the Department of Human Services, under Title 62A, Chapter 2, inpatient hospitals accredited by the joint commission on the accreditation of hospitals, or facilities licensed by the Department of Health.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

